North Dakota, session 69, HB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER - FOOD DISTRIBUTION FACILITY GRANT PROGRAM -
ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and
improvements fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $5,000,000, or so much
of the sum as may be necessary, to the agriculture commissioner for the purpose of providing a food
distribution facility grant program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Grant funds may be used only to pay for site acquisition, architectural costs, engineering costs, labor,
equipment, and materials related to the construction of a statewide charitable food distribution and
logistics facility. A grant recipient must provide one dollar of matching funds from nonstate sources for
each dollar provided by the agriculture commissioner. Entities receiving funding under this section shall
report to the agriculture commissioner annually regarding the use and effectiveness of the funding. The
funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

H. B. NO. 1143 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1143.
House Vote: Yeas 71 Nays 16 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 36 Nays 9 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State